Massachusetts, session 194th, H5452.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the 
licensing authority of the town of Oxford may grant two additional licenses for the sale of all 
alcoholic beverages not to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section 15 of said chapter 138 to 
establishments located within the 3 economic development zones described in subsection (b) 
upon approval of and under conditions set by the licensing authority of the town of Oxford. A 
license granted under this act shall be clearly marked on its face either “Highway Interchange”, 
“Village Business”, or “General Business” as applicable, and subject to all of said chapter 138 
except said section 17. 
(b) The licensing authority shall restrict the licenses authorized in this act to 
establishments located with either the town’s: (i) “Highway Interchange” zone as designated on 
the map, (ii) “Village Business” zone, which shall include only the Central Business and Central 
Professional zones as designated on the map, or (iii) “General Business” zone, which shall 
include only the northerly and southerly parcels directly abutting U.S. Route 20 that are included 

of 2 14 in the area designated as the General Business zone on the map. For the purposes of this 
subsection, “map” shall mean as those areas designated on a map entitled “Zoning Map” 
produced by the town of Oxford’s Clerk’s Office and dated April 29, 2026, a copy of which is on 
file in the office of the town clerk of the town of Oxford. 
(c) The licensing authority of the town of Oxford shall not approve the transfer of a 
license granted pursuant to this act to a location outside of the town’s initial zoned area as 
described in clause (i), (ii) or (iii) of subsection (b), but it may grant such license to a new 
applicant within such initial zoned area if the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter 
from the department of revenue and a letter from the department of unemployment assistance 
indicating that the license is in good standing with those departments and that all applicable 
taxes, fees, and contributions have been paid.   
(d) If the licensee terminates or fails to renew a license granted under this section or any  
such license is cancelled, revoked, or no longer in use, it shall be returned physically, with all of 
the legal rights, privileges, and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority and the 
licensing authority may then grant the license to a new applicant under the same conditions as 
specified in this act.   
(e) All licenses granted under this act shall be issued within 5 years after the effective 
date of this act; provided, however, that a license originally granted within that time period may 
be granted to a new applicant under subsections (c) and (d) thereafter.   
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.